bg-BG: Материал на плъзгача на бас тромбона: Месинг; Хромиран; Златен месинг; Алпака; Розов месинг; Неръждаема стомана; Друго
es: Material para la vara del trombón bajo: Latón; Cromado; Latón dorado; Alpaca; Latón rosa; Acero inoxidable; Otro
tr: Bas trombon sürgü malzemesi: Pirinç; Krom kaplama; Altın pirinç; Nikel gümüş; Gül pirinç; Paslanmaz çelik; Diğer
fi: Bassopasuunan liukumateriaali: Messinki; Kromattu; Kultamessinki; Uushopea; Ruusumessinki; Ruostumaton teräs; Muu
sl-SI: Material poteznice basovske pozavne: Medenina; Kromirano; Zlata medenina; Novo srebro; Rožnata medenina; Nerjavno jeklo; Drugo
ru: Материал кулисы бас-тромбона: Латунь; Хромированный; Золотая латунь; Нейзильбер; Розовая латунь; Нержавеющая сталь; Другое
cs: Materiál snižce pro basový pozoun: Mosaz; Pochromované; Zlatá mosaz; Alpaka; Červená mosaz; Nerezová ocel; Jiné
hr-HR: Materijal povlačka bas-trombona: Mjed; Kromirano; Zlatna mjed; Novo srebro; Ružičasta mjed; Nehrđajući čelik; Ostalo
hu: Basszusharsonaszán anyaga: Sárgaréz; Krómozott; Aranyréz; Újezüst; Rózsaréz; Rozsdamentes acél; Egyéb
nl: Bastrombone schuifmateriaal: Messing; Verchroomd; Goudmessing; Nieuwzilver; Rosémessing; Roestvrij staal; Overig
pt-BR: Material da vara do trombone baixo: Latão; Cromado; Latão dourado; Prata niquelada; Latão rosa; Aço inoxidável; Outros
de: Zugmaterial der Bassposaune: Messing; Verchromt; Goldmessing; Neusilber; Rotmessing; Edelstahl; Sonstige
pt-PT: Material da vara deslizante de trombone baixo: Latão; Cromado; Latão dourado; Alpaca; Latão rosa; Aço inoxidável; Outro
ja: バストロンボーンのスライド素材: 真鍮; クロムメッキ; ゴールドブラス; 洋白 (ニッケルシルバー); ローズブラス; ステンレス鋼; その他
sk-SK: Materiál posunovača pre basový trombón: Mosadz; Pochrómované; Zlatá mosadz; Alpaka; Ružová mosadz; Nehrdzavejúca oceľ; Iné
sv: Material för bastrombonens dragbyglar: Mässing; Förkromad; Guldmässing; Nysilver; Rosémässing; Rostfritt stål; Övrigt
zh-TW: 低音長號滑管材質: 黃銅; 鍍鉻; 金銅; 鎳銀合金; 玫瑰銅; 不鏽鋼; 其他
fr: Matériau de la coulisse de trombone basse: Laiton; Plaqué chrome; Laiton doré; Maillechort; Laiton rose; Acier inoxydable; Autre
pl: Materiał suwaka puzonu basowego: Mosiądz; Chromowany; Złoty mosiądz; Nowe srebro; Różowy mosiądz; Stal nierdzewna; Inne
el: Υλικό διαφάνειας για μπάσο τρομπόνι: Ορείχαλκος; Επιχρωμιωμένο; Χρυσός ορείχαλκος; Αλπακάς; Ροζ ορείχαλκος; Ανοξείδωτος χάλυβας; Άλλο
ro-RO: Material glisiere trombon bas: Alamă; Placat cu crom; Alamă aurie; Alpaca (nichel-argint); Alamă roz; Oțel inoxidabil; Altele
zh-CN: 低音长号滑管材质: 黄铜; 镀铬; 金黄铜; 白铜; 玫瑰黄铜; 不锈钢; 其他
da: Materiale i basbasunens træk: Messing; Forkromet; Guldmessing; Nysølv; Rosamessing; Rustfrit stål; Andet
lt-LT: Bosinio trombono slankiklio medžiaga: Žalvaris; Chromuotas; Auksinis žalvaris; Melchioras; Rausvasis žalvaris; Nerūdijantysis plienas; Kita
th: วัสดุสไลด์ของทรอมโบนเบส: ทองเหลือง; ชุบโครเมียม; โกลด์บราส; นิกเกิลซิลเวอร์; โรสบราส; สเตนเลสสตีล; อื่นๆ
nb: Basstrombone-slidemateriale: Messing; Forkrommet; Gullmessing; Nysølv; Rosemessing; Rustfritt stål; Annet
it: Materiale per coulisse del trombone basso: Ottone; Cromato; Ottone dorato; Alpacca; Ottone rosa; Acciaio inossidabile; Altro
ko: 베이스 트롬본 슬라이드 재질: 황동; 크롬 도금; 골드 브라스; 니켈 실버; 로즈 브라스; 스테인리스 스틸; 기타
en: Bass trombone slide material: Brass; Chrome-plated; Gold brass; Nickel silver; Rose brass; Stainless steel; Other
vi: Vật liệu ống trượt kèn trombone bass: Đồng thau; Mạ chrome; Đồng vàng; Bạc niken; Đồng hồng; Thép không gỉ; Khác